Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.050

Challenges to referees.

If a referee is appointed by the court, each party shall have the same right to challenge the appointment. Challenges shall be made and determined in the same manner and with like effect as in the formation of juries, except that neither party shall be entitled to a peremptory challenge.

[ 1984 c 258 s 516; Code 1881 s 252; 1877 p 52 s 256; 1869 p 61 s 256; RRS s 373.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.